Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB911.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 53 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 2182. Law enforcement officer benefits for surviving family members.(a) Death.--Except as otherwise provided in this section, if a full-time law enforcement officer dies in the line of duty:(1) The surviving spouse of the law enforcement officer shall be entitled to receive full health benefits for the remainder of the life of the spouse.(2) Each eligible dependent of the law enforcement officer shall be entitled to receive full health benefits until reaching 26 years of age if the dependent is not 1234567891011121314151617 eligible for coverage under another eligible employer-sponsored health plan.(b) Disability.--If a full-time law enforcement officer is disabled AND UNABLE TO PERFORM ANY POLICE DUTY FOR WHICH THE OFFICER IS REASONABLY SUITED BY EDUCATION, TRAINING OR EXPERIENCE from an accident occurring as a result of the performance of duties while employed:(1) The law enforcement officer and the law enforcement officer's spouse shall be entitled to receive full health benefits for the remainder of the life of the law enforcement officer.(2) Each eligible dependent of the law enforcement officer shall be entitled to receive full health benefits until reaching 26 years of age if the dependent is not eligible for coverage under another eligible employer-sponsored health plan.(c) Line-of-duty death investigation and determination.--(1) If an investigation is needed prior to making a line-of-duty death determination regarding a law enforcement officer for the purposes of this section, existing health benefits of the law enforcement officer shall be uninterrupted for the duration of the investigation.(2) The following may make a line-of-duty death determination regarding a law enforcement officer for the purposes of this section:(i) The police department or regional police department that employed the law enforcement officer.(ii) The Department of General Services in accordance with the act of June 24, 1976 (P.L.424, No.101), referred to as the Emergency and Law Enforcement 20250HB0911PN3627 - 2 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Personnel Death Benefits Act.(iii) The Bureau of Justice Assistance within the United States Department of Justice in accordance with 34 U.S.C. Ch. 101 Subch. XI Pt. A (relating to death benefits).(d) Assistance.--A municipality OR REGIONAL POLICE DEPARTMENT shall assist a surviving spouse with navigating the process of claims and payments under this section.(e) Termination of benefits.--All health benefits under this section shall cease upon the recipient of the health care benefits reaching 65 years of age.(f) Construction.--If a collective bargaining agreement provides equal or greater health benefits than those provided under this section, the collective bargaining agreement shall govern.(g) Applicability.--In addition to applying to all law enforcement officers that died in the line of duty, subsections (a) and (b) apply to a surviving spouse of a law enforcement officer that was widowed before the effective date of this subsection.(E) TERMINATION OF BENEFITS.--A MUNICIPALITY MAY TERMINATE HEALTH BENEFITS UNDER THIS SECTION IF:(1) A SURVIVING SPOUSE OF A DECEASED LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER REMARRIES; OR(2) A SURVIVING SPOUSE RECEIVES EQUIVALENT HEALTH BENEFITS FROM THE SURVIVING SPOUSE'S EMPLOYER.(F) MEDICARE ELIGIBILITY.--WHEN A RECIPIENT OF HEALTH BENEFITS UNDER THIS SECTION IS ENTITLED TO OR ENROLLED IN MEDICARE:(1) THE RECIPIENT SHALL UTILIZE THE FEDERAL MEDICARE 20250HB0911PN3627 - 3 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 PROGRAM AS THE RECIPIENT'S PRIMARY HEALTH BENEFIT.(2) IN THE CASE OF A SURVIVING SPOUSE OF A DECEASED LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER WHO SERVED A MUNICIPALITY, THE MUNICIPALITY SHALL PROVIDE SUPPLEMENTAL MEDICARE PROGRAM COVERAGE THROUGH THE CARRIER PROVIDING COVERAGE AT THE TIME OF THE LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER'S DEATH.(3) IN THE CASE OF A SURVIVING SPOUSE OF A DECEASED LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER WHO SERVED A REGIONAL POLICE DEPARTMENT, THE REGIONAL POLICE DEPARTMENT SHALL PROVIDE SUPPLEMENTAL MEDICARE PROGRAM COVERAGE THROUGH THE CARRIER PROVIDING COVERAGE AT THE TIME OF THE LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER'S DEATH.(G) APPLICABILITY.--IN ADDITION TO LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICERS WHO DIED IN THE LINE OF DUTY:(1) SUBSECTION (A) SHALL APPLY TO A SURVIVING SPOUSE OF A LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER WHO DIED IN THE LINE OF DUTY, IF THE SURVIVING SPOUSE WAS WIDOWED BEFORE THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SUBSECTION.(2) SUBSECTION (B) SHALL APPLY TO A LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER WHO BECAME DISABLED AND THE SPOUSE OF A LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER WHO BECAME DISABLED, IF THE DISABILITY OCCURRED BEFORE THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SUBSECTION.(h) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Law enforcement officer." As the term "police officer" is defined in section 2162 (relating to definitions)."FULL HEALTH BENEFITS." THE SAME LEVEL OF HEALTH INSURANCE COVERAGE FROM THE SAME CARRIER THAT A SURVIVING SPOUSE OR DEPENDENT RECEIVED AT THE TIME OF THE LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER'S DEATH.20250HB0911PN3627 - 4 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER." A FULL-TIME OR PART-TIME EMPLOYEE ASSIGNED TO CRIMINAL OR TRAFFIC LAW ENFORCEMENT DUTIES OF:(1) A POLICE DEPARTMENT OF A MUNICIPALITY; OR(2) A REGIONAL POLICE DEPARTMENT."MEDICARE." HEALTH BENEFITS PROVIDED UNDER 42 U.S.C. CH. 7 SUBCH. XVIII (RELATING TO HEALTH INSURANCE FOR AGED AND DISABLED)."Municipality." A county, city, borough, incorporated town or township."REGIONAL POLICE DEPARTMENT." A POLICE DEPARTMENT FORMED BY TWO OR MORE MUNICIPALITIES UNDER SUBCHAPTER A OF CHAPTER 23 (RELATING TO INTERGOVERNMENTAL COOPERATION).Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0911PN3627 - 5 - <--12345678910111213